District of Columbia statutes.
1-301.75

Increase or decrease of fees authorized in § 1-301.74.

The Mayor of the District of Columbia may after public hearing increase or decrease the fees authorized to be charged by each of the sections listed in § 1-301.74 to such amounts as may, in the judgment of the Mayor, be reasonably necessary to defray the approximate cost of administering each of said sections.

June 5, 1953, 67 Stat. 43, ch. 101, § 2
June 22, 1983, D.C. Law 5-14, § 206(c), 30 DCR 2632
Electrical fees, schedules, see § 47-2712.
Public space permits, fee schedules, see § 47-2718.
This section is referenced in § 1-301.74.
1981 Ed., § 1-347.
1973 Ed., § 1-253.
Mayor authorized to issue rules: See Historical and Statutory Notes following § 1-1201.